Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-110.02
Government document, defined.

Government document means an identification document or other document issued by a federal, state, or local government agency that includes the name and address of the voter as they appear on his or her voter registration application, including those documents that acknowledge the person's civil or legal status or entitlement to a government service or program.

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 3.